Utah statutes.
31A-14-214.   Amendment to articles and notice of corporate reorganization.
Sections 16-10a-1001 through 16-10a-1004 apply when a foreign insurer amends
its articles of incorporation.  If a foreign insurer plans to undergo any
corporate reorganization of the kinds dealt with in Chapter 5, Part 5,
Corporate Reorganization, the insurer shall notify the commissioner in
writing, at the same time that the first formal step of the statutory
procedure for achieving the reorganization is taken in the domiciliary
jurisdiction or elsewhere.  The insurer shall provide the details required by
the commissioner, whether by rule or order.
